Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-1446.02
Committee; certain expenditure of funds; prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, no committee shall expend funds for the purchase or payment of:

(1) Clothes or medical or dental expenses of a candidate or the members of his or her immediate family;

(2) Installment payments for an automobile owned by a candidate;

(3) Mortgage or rental payments for a permanent residence of a candidate;

(4) The satisfaction of personal debts, including installment payments on personal loans, except campaign loans subject to reporting required by subsection (2) of section 49-1456;

(5) Personal services, including the services of a lawyer or accountant, except campaign services subject to reporting pursuant to the provisions of section 49-1455 and security services as described in subdivision (10) of section 49-1446.03; or

(6) Office supplies, staff, or furnishings for the public office for which an individual is a candidate for nomination or election except as set out in subsection (2) of section 49-1446.01 and subdivision (10) of section 49-1446.03.

Laws 1981, LB 134, § 6;

Laws 1992, LB 722, § 2;

Laws 2005, LB 242, § 10;

Laws 2026, LB986, § 1.
April 15, 2026